fi: Moottoriajoneuvon maalin levitysmenetelmä: Aerosolispraypullo; Kynäruisku; Siveltävä; Telattava; Maaliruisku (HVLP/perinteinen); Korjausmaalipullo siveltimellä; Korjausmaalikynä; Muu
ru: Метод нанесения автомобильной краски: Аэрозольный баллончик; Аэрограф; Нанесение кистью; Нанесение валиком; Краскопульт (HVLP/традиционный); Флакон для подкраски с кисточкой; Карандаш для подкраски; Другое
en: Motor vehicle paint application method: Aerosol spray can; Airbrush; Brush-on; Roll-on; Spray gun (HVLP/conventional); Touch-up bottle w/ brush; Touch-up pen; Other
es: Método de aplicación de pintura para vehículos a motor: Lata de aerosol; Aerógrafo; Con brocha; Con rodillo; Pistola de pulverización (HVLP/convencional); Botella de retoque con pincel; Lápiz de retoque; Otro
sv: Appliceringsmetod för motorfordonsfärg: Sprayburk; Airbrush; Pensel; Roller; Sprutpistol (HVLP/konventionell); Bättringsflaska med pensel; Bättringspenna; Övrigt
cs: Metoda nanášení laku na motorová vozidla: Aerosol ve spreji; Airbrush; Nanášení štětcem; Nanášení válečkem; Stříkací pistole (HVLP/konvenční); Korekční lahvička se štětečkem; Korekční pero; Jiné
it: Metodo di applicazione della vernice per veicoli a motore: Bomboletta spray; Aerografo; A pennello; A rullo; Pistola a spruzzo (HVLP/convenzionale); Flaconcino per ritocchi con pennello; Penna per ritocchi; Altro
hr-HR: Metoda primjene boja za motorna vozila: Aerosolni sprej; Zračni kist; Nanošenje kistom; Nanošenje valjkom; Pištolj za prskanje (HVLP / konvencionalni); Bočica za popravke s kistom; Olovka za popravke; Ostalo
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės dažų naudojimo metodas: Aerozolinis flakonas; Aerografas; Tepama teptuku; Užtepama voleliu; Dažymo pistoletas (HVLP / standartinis); Buteliukas korekcijai su teptuku; Pieštukas korekcijai; Kita
nl: Motorvoertuig lak applicatiemethode: Spuitbus; Airbrush; Kwast; Roller; Spuitpistool (HVLP/conventioneel); Lakstiftflesje met kwastje; Lakstift; Overig
vi: Phương pháp sơn xe cơ giới: Bình xịt khí dung; Súng phun sơn cỡ nhỏ (Airbrush); Quét bằng cọ; Lăn bằng con lăn; Súng phun (HVLP/thông thường); Lọ sơn dặm kèm cọ; Bút sơn dặm; Khác
tr: Motorlu taşıt boyası uygulama yöntemi: Aerosol sprey kutusu; Airbrush; Fırçalı; Rulolu; Boya tabancası (HVLP/geleneksel); Fırçalı rötuş şişesi; Rötuş kalemi; Diğer
el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής βαφής μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Δοχείο σπρέι αεροζόλ; Αερογράφος; Με πινέλο; Με ρολό; Πιστόλι βαφής (HVLP/συμβατικό); Μπουκαλάκι επιδιόρθωσης με πινέλο; Στυλό επιδιόρθωσης; Άλλο
pt-PT: Método de aplicação de tinta para veículos motorizados: Lata de spray aerossol; Aerógrafo; Com pincel; Com rolo; Pistola de pulverização (HVLP/convencional); Frasco de retoque com pincel; Caneta de retoque; Outro
sk-SK: Spôsob nanášania laku na motorové vozidlá: Aerosólový sprej; Airbrush; Nanášanie štetcom; Nanášanie valčekom; Striekacia pištoľ (HVLP/konvenčná); Opravná fľaštička so štetcom; Opravné pero; Iné
hu: Gépjárműfesték felviteli módszere: Aeroszolos flakon; Festékszóró (Airbrush); Ecsetelhető; Hengerelhető; Szórópisztoly (HVLP/hagyományos); Javítófesték ecsettel; Javítótoll; Egyéb
ja: 自動車塗装の適用方法: エアゾールスプレー缶; エアブラシ; 筆塗り; ローラー塗り; スプレーガン (HVLP/従来型); ブラシ付きタッチアップボトル; タッチアップペン; その他
pt-BR: Veículo automotor pintura método de aplicação: Lata de spray aerossol; Aerógrafo; Aplicação com pincel; Aplicação com rolo; Pistola de pintura (HVLP/convencional); Frasco de retoque com pincel; Caneta de retoque; Outros
da: Metode til påføring af lak på motorkøretøjer: Spraydåse; Airbrush; Påføring med pensel; Påføring med rulle; Sprøjtepistol (HVLP/konventionel); Reparationsflaske med pensel; Lakstift; Andet
pl: Lakierowanie pojazdów silnikowych metoda aplikacji: Spray (puszka); Aerograf; Pędzel; Wałek; Pistolet natryskowy (HVLP / konwencjonalny); Butelka do zaprawek z pędzelkiem; Pisak do zaprawek; Inne
de: Auftragsmethode für Fahrzeuglack: Sprühdose; Airbrush; Pinselauftrag; Rollenauftrag; Spritzpistole (HVLP/konventionell); Ausbesserungsflasche mit Pinsel; Lackstift; Sonstige
sl-SI: Način nanašanja barve motornega vozila: Aerosol v razpršilu; Aerograf (airbrush); Nanašanje s čopičem; Nanašanje z valjčkom; Brizgalna pištola (HVLP/konvencionalna); Korektura v steklenički s čopičem; Korektura v pisalu; Drugo
bg-BG: Метод за нанасяне на боя за моторно превозно средство: Аерозолен флакон; Аерограф; С четка; С валяк; Пистолет за боядисване (HVLP/конвенционален); Шише за корекции с четка; Маркер за корекции; Друго
ko: 차량용 페인트 도포 방법: 에어로졸 스프레이 캔; 에어브러시; 브러시온; 롤온; 스프레이 건(HVLP/일반); 브러시가 포함된 터치업 병; 터치업 펜; 기타
nb: Påføringsmetode for billakk: Aerosolsprayboks; Airbrush; Påføring med pensel; Påføring med rulle; Lakksprøyte (HVLP/konvensjonell); Lakkflaske med pensel; Lakkpenn; Annet
fr: Mode d’application de la peinture automobile: Bombe aérosol; Aérographe; Au pinceau; Au rouleau; Pistolet à peinture (HVLP/conventionnel); Flacon de retouche avec pinceau; Stylo de retouche; Autre
zh-CN: 机动车油漆施工方法: 气雾喷罐; 喷枪; 刷涂; 滚涂; 喷枪（HVLP/传统）; 带刷补漆瓶; 补漆笔; 其他
ro-RO: Metoda de aplicare a vopselei autovehiculelor: Tub spray aerosol; Aerograf; Cu pensula; Cu rola; Pistol de vopsit (HVLP/convențional); Sticlă pentru retuș cu pensulă; Creion pentru retuș; Altele
zh-TW: 汽車塗料施用方式: 噴霧罐; 噴槍; 刷塗; 滾塗; 噴漆槍 (HVLP/傳統); 附刷補漆瓶; 補漆筆; 其他
th: วิธีการพ่นสีรถยนต์: กระป๋องสเปรย์; แอร์บรัช; แบบแปรงทา; แบบลูกกลิ้งทา; ปืนพ่นสี (HVLP/แบบดั้งเดิม); ขวดสีแต้มพร้อมพู่กัน; ปากกาแต้มสี; อื่นๆ